twol-sms.txt
Alphabet
  a b c d e f g h i ï j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z æ ä ø ö å
  0:a 0:e 0:ö 0:å
  A1:a A1:e
!  A2:a
  A2:a A2:e A2:0
  A3:a A3:o A3:e
  A4:a A4:e A4:i A4:o
  E1:i E1:e E1:y
!  E2:0
  E2:0 E2:e
  I1:i I1:e I1:0
  I2:i I2:e I2:0
  I3:i I3:j
  I4:e I4:i I4:0
  O1:o
!  O2:o
  O2:o O2:0
!  U1:u U1:ö
  U1:u U1:ö U1:å
  U2:e
  Æ:æ Æ:i Æ:y
  Å1:å Å1:u Å1:o
!  Å2:a Å2:e
  Å2:a Å2:e Å2:å
  Å3:å Å3:ö
  Å4:å
  D1:0
  %#:0 %>:0 %+:0 ;

Sets
  Letter = a b c d e f g h i ï j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z æ ä ø ö å ;
  C      =   b c d   f g h     j k l m n   p q r s t   v w x   z           ;
  CJV    =   b c d   f g h       k l m n   p q r s t     w x   z           ;
  V      = a       e       i ï           o           u       y   æ ä ø ö å
           A1 A2 A3 A4 E1 E2 I1 I2 I3 I4 O1 O2 U1 U2 Æ Å1 Å2 Å3 Å4 ;
  DobCons = s m ;
  Bound   = # %> ;
  WordBound = # ;
  DomainBound = %# %+ ;

Definitions
  Vowel    = [ :V ] ;
  Nucleus  = [ Vowel (Vowel)] ;
  Cons     = [ C [ :C* | D1:*]] ;
  ConsJV   = [CJV [ :C* | D1:*]];
  AccGenSg = [ %>: [m | n ]] ;
  Syllable1 = DomainBound: C*;
  Syllable2 = Syllable1 Nucleus Cons;
  OpenFinal = Cons Nucleus DomainBound: ;
  OpenOrClosedFinal = [Cons (Nucleus) DomainBound:];

Rules
 
 ! Bisyllabic stems

! Rules for ie nouns
 
! Final vowel is ie

  "I2 as ie"
  I2:i <=> Syllable2 _ 0:e (%>: [ I3:j | Cons ]) DomainBound:;

! Final vowel is e
  "I2 as e"
  I2:e <=> Syllable2 _ %>: OpenFinal;

! Final vowels is 0, suffix is vowel-initial
  "I2 as 0"
  I2:0 <=> Syllable2 _ %>: Nucleus (Cons) (Nucleus)  DomainBound: ;
  
! Rules for oe nouns
  "O2 as oe and o"
  O2:o <=> Syllable2 _ 0:e (%>: [ I3:j | Cons ]) DomainBound: ;
           Syllable2 _ %>: OpenFinal ;

  "O2 as 0"
  O2:0 <=>  Syllable2 _ %>: A1: OpenFinal ;

! Rules for a-nouns
! A2 as e, as in three-syllabic forms
  "A2 as e"
  A2:e <=> Syllable2 _ %>: OpenFinal ;

! A2 not realised, followed by a nucleus-initial affix
  "A2 as 0"
  A2:0 <=> Syllable2 _ %>: Nucleus (Cons) (Nucleus) (:0) DomainBound: ;

! Rules for e-nouns

! Rules for E2
  "E2 as 0"
   E2:0 <=> Syllable2 _ %>: [h | Nucleus (Cons) (Nucleus)] DomainBound: ;


! Rules for two-syllable contexts
  "I1 as ie"
  I1:i <=> Syllable2 _ 0:e Cons [Nucleus %>: | V:0 %>: Nucleus] 
                                         OpenFinal ;

           Syllable2 Nucleus Cons [Nucleus %>: | (V:0) %>: Nucleus]
                                        Cons _ 0:e DomainBound:;
  "O1 as oe"
  O1:o <=> Syllable2 _ 0:e Cons [Nucleus %>: | (V:0) %>: Nucleus]
                                         OpenFinal ;

 "A3, I1, O1 when preceding v"
  Cx:Cy <=> Syllable2 _ v
                       (Cons) [ Nucleus (AccGenSg) | V:0 %>:  [h | :i ]] DomainBound: ;
           where Cx in (A3 I1 O1)
                 Cy in (o  u  o)
           matched;

! The rules for a preceding j (A-j, C-j) are strictly parallel.


 "I1, O1 when preceding j"
  Cx:Cy <=> Syllable2 _ j
                       (Cons) [ Nucleus (AccGenSg) | V:0 %>:  [h | :i ]] DomainBound: ;
           where Cx in (I1 O1)
                 Cy in (i o)
           matched;

! The B-x and C-x cases are covered by the following rules

  "I1 as e"
   I1:e <=> Syllable2 _ 
                  ConsJV [ Nucleus (AccGenSg) | V:0 %>:  [h | :i ]] DomainBound: ;
            Syllable2 [ [I2:e | O2:o ] %>: | 
                                           V:0 %>: [:e | :i]] Cons _ DomainBound: ;

  "O1 as o, A3 as e"
   Cx:Cy <=> Syllable2 _ ConsJV [Nucleus (AccGenSg) | V:0 %>:
                                           [h | :i]] DomainBound: ;
             where Cx in (A3 O1)
                   Cy in (e  o)
             matched;

! Rules for I4:
  "I4 as e"
   I4:e <=> Syllable2 Nucleus Cons _ (AccGenSg) DomainBound: ;

  "I4 as i"
   I4:i <=> Syllable2 Nucleus Cons _ %>: OpenFinal ;

  "I4 as 0"
   I4:0 <=> Syllable2 Nucleus Cons _ %>: [Nucleus (Cons Nucleus) | h]
                                                         DomainBound: ;

! Umlaut in row A in the umlaut table
  "Umlaut in ie-context, monopthongs"
  Cx:Cy <=> Syllable1 _ Cons [I2:i | I2:e] ;
        where Cx in (Æ A4 Å1)
	      Cy in (i e  u )
	matched ;

! Umlaut in row B in the umlaut table
  "Umlaut in a-context, monopthongs"
  Cx:Cy <=> Syllable1 _ Cons I2:0 %>: A1:a ;
        where Cx in (Æ A4 Å1)
	      Cy in (æ a  å )
	matched ;

! Umlaut in row C in the umlaut table
  "Umlaut in oe-context, monopthongs"
  Cx:Cy <=> Syllable1 _ Cons O2:o ;
        where Cx in (Æ A4 Å1)
	      Cy in (æ a  å )
	matched ;

! Umlaut in row E in the umlaut table
  "Umlaut before affixes on A1:e, row E, monophtongs"
  Cx:Cy <=> Syllable1 _ Cons [I2:0|O2:0] %>: A1:e OpenOrClosedFinal ;
        where Cx in (Æ A4 Å1)
	      Cy in (y o  o )
	matched ;

! Umlaut in row F in the umlaut table
  "Umlaut before affixes on -i, row F, monopthongs"
  Cx:Cy <=> Syllable1 _ Cons I2:0 %>: :i (Cons Nucleus) DomainBound: ;
        where Cx in (Æ A4 Å1)
	      Cy in (i  i u )
	matched ;

! Dipthongs

! Umlaut in row A in the umlaut table
  "Umlaut in ie-context, diphthongs"
  Cx:Cy <=> Syllable1 _ 0:e Cons [ I2:i | I2:e ] ;
	    where Cx in (E1 Å2 Å3 U1)
                  Cy in (i  a  å  u )
            matched;

! Umlaut in row B in the umlaut table
  "Umlaut in a-context, diphthongs"
  Cx:Cy <=> Syllable1 _ 0:a Cons I2: %>: A1:a ;
	    where Cx in (E1 Å2 Å3 U1)
                  Cy in (e  a  å  u )
            matched;

! Umlaut in row C in the umlaut table
  "Umlaut in oe-context, diphthongs"
  Cx:Cy <=> Syllable1 _ 0:a Cons O2:o ;
	    where Cx in (E1 Å2 Å3 U1)
                  Cy in (e  a  å  å )
            matched;

  "Å4 to åe and åa"
  Å4:å <=> Syllable1 _ 0:a C+ I2: %>: A1: ;
           Syllable1 _ 0:e C+ [I2:i |I2:e | I2:0 %>: Nucleus] ;

! Umlaut in row E in the umlaut table
  "Umlaut before affixes with A1:e, row E, diphthongs"
  Cx:Cy <=> Syllable1 _ 0:Cy Cons [I2:0 | O2:0] %>: A1:e
                              OpenOrClosedFinal ;
            where Cx in (Å2 Å3 U1)
                  Cy in (å  å  å )
            matched;

! Umlaut in row E in the umlaut table ie->yö
  "Umlaut before affixes with A1, row E, ie->yö"
  E1:y <=> Syllable1 _ 0:ö Cons [I2:0 | O2:0] %>: [A1:a | A1:e]
                              OpenOrClosedFinal ;

! Umlaut in row F in the umlaut table
  "Umlaut before affixes on -i, row F, diphthongs"
  Cx:Cy <=> Syllable1 _ 0:Cy Cons I2:0 %>: :i
                              (Cons Nucleus) DomainBound: ;
            where Cx in (E1 Å2 Å3 U1)
                  Cy in (e  e  ö  ö )
            matched;

! Rules for I3 (genitive plural):
  "I3 as j"
   I3:j <=> [I2:i 0:e | A2: | O2:o 0:e] %>: _ DomainBound: ;

  "I2 not as 0"
   I2:0 /<= Syllable1 Å4:å 0:e Cons _ %>: I3: DomainBound: ;


! Rules for surface dipthtongs

  "Inserted a"
  0:a <=>  Syllable1 [E1:| Å2: | Å3: | U1:] _ Cons I2: %>: A1:a ;
           Syllable1 [E1:| Å2: | Å3:| U1:]  _ Cons O2:o ;
           Syllable1 Å4: _ C+ I2: %>: A1: ;

  "Inserted e"
  0:e <=> Syllable2 [I2:|O2:] _ (%>: [ I3:j | Cons ]) DomainBound:;
          Syllable2 I1: _ Cons [Nucleus %>: | V:0 %>: Nucleus] OpenFinal ;
          Syllable2 Nucleus Cons [Nucleus %>: | (V:0) %>: Nucleus] Cons I1: _ 
          DomainBound:;
          Syllable2 O1: _ Cons [Nucleus %>: | (V:0) %>: Nucleus] OpenFinal ;
	  Syllable1 [E1:| Å2:| Å3:| U1:] _ Cons [ I2:i | I2:e ] ;
          Syllable1 Å4: _ C+ [I2:i |I2:e | I2:0 %>: Nucleus] ;
          [I2: | O2:] _ %>: I3: DomainBound: ;
	  Syllable1 [E1:|Å2:] _ Cons I2:0 %>: :i (Cons Nucleus) DomainBound: ;

  "Inserted ö"
  0:ö <=> Syllable1 E1: _ 
          Cons [I2:0 | O2:0] %>: [A1:a | A1:e] OpenOrClosedFinal ;
	  Syllable1 [Å3:|U1:] _
          Cons I2:0 %>: :i (Cons Nucleus) DomainBound: ;

  "Inserted å"
  0:å <=> Syllable1 [Å2:| Å3:| U1:] _
          Cons [I2:0 | O2:0] %>: A1:e OpenOrClosedFinal ;
